Florida, session 2026, SB1572.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 52 53 Section 1.âSection 17.324, Florida Statutes, is created to 54 read: 55 17.324âFlorida Agency for Fiscal Oversight.â 56 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 57 (a)ââAgencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 283.30. 58 (b)ââLocal governmentâ has the same meaning as in s. 59 106.113(1). 60 (c)ââNoncompliantâ means, as determined by the Chief 61 Financial Officer, failing to respond to a request for 62 information, failing to include any requested information, or 63 providing incomplete or materially inaccurate information. 64 (d)ââState fundsâ means funds provided to a local 65 government by the state, state shared revenue, state grants, 66 sales tax collected pursuant to chapter 212, and enterprise 67 funds as defined in s. 350.81(1); however, it does not include 68 local funds derived from local taxes or fees or funds related to 69 public safety. 70 (2)âThe Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight is established 71 within the department. The purpose of the Florida Agency for 72 Fiscal Oversight is to identify and report unnecessary spending 73 within any agency or local governments and to provide fiscal 74 management and public spending education and training to such 75 governments. The Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight shall: 76 (a)âDevelop the mandatory financial ethics training 77 required under s. 112.31424(2). The training must include 78 instruction on: 79 1.âRecognizing misuse of public funds. 80 2.âReporting financial misconduct. 81 3.âWhistle-blower rights and protections. 82 (b)âProvide guidance and materials to agencies and local 83 governments for internal training sessions. 84 (c)âComplete the audit of a local government required under 85 subsection (3). 86 (d)âDetermine the information required in the Local 87 Government Efficiency Report required by s. 112.31424(5). 88 (3)(a)âA local government must notify the Florida Agency 89 for Fiscal Oversight within 5 days after authorizing a 90 referendum to levy a tax, increase a current tax, or increase 91 its millage rate. The Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight shall 92 conduct an audit of any such local government. The Florida 93 Agency for Fiscal Oversight may request any information it deems 94 necessary to conduct such audit. If a local government is 95 noncompliant, and at the discretion of the Chief Financial 96 Officer: 97 1.âAt least 15 days after the initial request: 98 a.âThe Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight may impose 99 administrative fines on local governments of no more than $1,000 100 each day; however, such fines may not be retroactive to the date 101 the request was first made. 102 b.âThe Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight must provide the 103 local government with written notice that if such local 104 government remains noncompliant, the Florida Agency for Fiscal 105 Oversight may initiate the process of withholding certain funds 106 payable to a local government beginning 45 days after the 107 initial request. 108 2.âAt least 45 days after the initial request, the Florida 109 Agency for Fiscal Oversight may withhold state funds until the 110 local government is no longer noncompliant or the final order 111 requires the release of such funds. 112 (b)âFines collected under sub-subparagraph (a)1.a. must be 113 deposited into the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund. The Florida 114 Agency for Fiscal Oversight may, for good cause or upon 115 demonstration of extenuating circumstances, waive any such fines 116 upon the request of the local government. 117 (c)âThe decision to withhold funds under subparagraph (a)2. 118 constitutes an agency action under chapter 120 and is subject to 119 review as provided in that chapter. 120 (4)âThe Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight may report any 121 evidence suggesting ethical violations, misconduct, or 122 malfeasance by a local government official to the Governor and 123 the Florida Commission on Ethics. The Florida Commission on 124 Ethics may recommend appropriate actions, including, but not 125 limited to, the removal of local government officials from 126 office. 127 (5)âThe department may create a Local Government Spending 128 Analysis to evaluate each local government based on the 129 information obtained under this section or from the report 130 required under s. 112.31424(5). If the department produces a 131 Local Government Spending Analysis, it must make such analysis 132 available on its website, and the local government that is the 133 subject of the analysis must include a link to the analysis in a 134 clear and conspicuous place on the local government website. 135 (6)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 136 section, including procedures for training, reporting, 137 investigations, and establishing financial thresholds, risk 138 indicators, or other criteria that, when met, may trigger an 139 audit, operational review, or investigation of a local 140 government by the Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight. 141 Section 2.âSubsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 17.325, 142 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 143 17.325âGovernmental efficiency hotline; duties of Chief 144 Financial Officer.â 145 (1)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall establish and operate 146 a statewide toll-free telephone hotline to receive information 147 or suggestions from the residents of this state on how to 148 improve the operation of state and local government, increase 149 state and local governmental efficiency, and eliminate waste in 150 state and local government. 151 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall operate the hotline 152 24 hours a day. The Chief Financial Officer may advertise the 153 availability of the hotline in newspapers of general circulation 154 in this state and shall provide for the posting of notices in 155 conspicuous places in state agency offices, city halls, county 156 courthouses, and places in which there is exposure to 157 significant numbers of the general public, including, but not 158 limited to, local convenience stores, shopping malls, shopping 159 centers, gasoline stations, or restaurants. The Chief Financial 160 Officer shall use the slogan âTell us where we can âGet Leanââ 161 for the hotline and in advertisements for the hotline. 162 (3)âEach telephone call on the hotline shall be received by 163 the office of the Chief Financial Officer, and the office of the 164 Chief Financial Officer shall conduct an evaluation to determine 165 if it is appropriate for the telephone call to be processed as a 166 government efficiency hotline âGet Leanâ telephone call. If it 167 is determined that the telephone call should be processed as a 168 government efficiency hotline âGet Leanâ telephone call, a 169 record of each suggestion or item of information received shall 170 be entered into a log kept by the Chief Financial Officer. A 171 caller on the hotline may remain anonymous, and, if the caller 172 provides his or her name, the name shall be confidential. If a 173 caller discloses that he or she is a state employee, the Chief 174 Financial Officer, in addition to maintaining a record as 175 required by this section, may refer any information or 176 suggestion from the caller to an existing state awards program 177 administered by the affected agency. The affected agency shall 178 conduct a preliminary evaluation of the efficacy of any 179 suggestion or item of information received through the hotline 180 and shall provide the Chief Financial Officer with a preliminary 181 determination of the amount of revenues the state might save by 182 implementing the suggestion or making use of the information. 183 Section 3.âSection 112.31424, Florida Statutes, is created 184 to read: 185 112.31424âFinancial ethics of governments.â 186 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 187 (a)ââAgencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.3187(3). 188 (b)ââEmployeeâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.3187(3). 189 (c)ââLocal governmentâ has the same meaning as in s. 190 106.113(1). 191 (2)âAll agency employees, elected officials, and volunteers 192 must complete the training on financial ethics created pursuant 193 to s. 17.324(2)(a) annually. The first training must be 194 completed within 30 days after: 195 (a)âFor a person employed by an agency, the first day of 196 employment. 197 (b)âFor an elected official within an agency, the day the 198 elected official takes office. 199 (c)âFor a volunteer of an agency, the first day the 200 volunteer begins volunteering. 201 (3)âNotwithstanding any other law, an employee who reports 202 information to the Florida Agency for Fiscal Oversight shall be 203 afforded the same protection as a whistle-blower under chapter 204 112. Such employee is not required to report the information 205 directly to his or her supervisory officials, his or her chief 206 executive officer as defined in s. 447.203(9), or any other 207 appropriate local official. 208 (4)âAn agency may not execute any contract, agreement, or 209 other document that: 210 (a)âProhibits an agency or a vendor, as defined in s. 211 287.1351(1), from participating with the Florida Agency for 212 Fiscal Oversight. 213 (b)âRequires an agency or a vendor, as defined in s. 214 287.1351(1), to execute a nondisclosure agreement as a condition 215 for performing any duties or functions with the Florida Agency 216 for Fiscal Oversight. 217 218 Any such contract, agreement, or document shall be void. 219 (5)âEach local government shall submit an annual Local 220 Government Efficiency Report to the Department of Financial 221 Services by October 30 of each year. The Department of Financial 222 Services shall adopt rules prescribing the format of such 223 reports and the information that must be included. The 224 department shall submit recommendations and findings from the 225 report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 226 House of Representatives and Office of Policy and Budget in the 227 Executive Office of the Governor by January 1 of each year. 228 Section 4.âSubsection (14) of section 215.985, Florida 229 Statutes, is amended to read: 230 215.985âTransparency in government spending.â 231 (14)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall establish and 232 maintain a secure contract tracking system available for viewing 233 and downloading by the public through a secure website. The 234 Chief Financial Officer shall use appropriate Internet security 235 measures to ensure that no person has the ability to alter or 236 modify records available on the website. 237 (a)âWithin 30 calendar days after executing a contract, 238 each state entity shall post the following information relating 239 to the contract on the contract tracking system: 240 1.âThe names of the contracting entities. 241 2.âThe procurement method. 242 3.âThe contract beginning and ending dates. 243 4.âThe nature or type of the commodities or services 244 purchased. 245 5.âApplicable contract unit prices and deliverables. 246 6.âTotal compensation to be paid or received under the 247 contract. 248 7.âAll payments made to the contractor to date. 249 8.âApplicable contract performance measures. 250 9.âIf a competitive solicitation was not used to procure 251 the goods or services, the justification of such action, 252 including citation to a statutory exemption or exception from 253 competitive solicitation, if any. 254 10.âElectronic copies of the contract and procurement 255 documents that have been redacted to exclude confidential or 256 exempt information. 257 (b)âWithin 30 calendar days after executing a contract, 258 each county shall post the following information relating to the 259 contract on the contract tracking system or an alternate 260 contract tracking system authorized by the department: 261 1.âThe names of the contracting entities. 262 2.âThe procurement method. 263 3.âThe contract beginning and ending dates. 264 4.âThe nature or type of the commodities or services 265 purchased. 266 5.âApplicable contract unit prices and deliverables. 267 6.âTotal compensation to be paid or received under the 268 contract. 269 7.âApplicable contract performance measures. 270 8.âIf a competitive solicitation was not used to procure 271 the goods or services, the justification of such action, 272 including citation to a statutory exemption or an exception from 273 competitive solicitation, if any. 274 9.âElectronic copies of the contract and procurement 275 documents that have been redacted as required by paragraph (e). 276 (c)(b)âWithin 30 calendar days after an amendment to an 277 existing contract, the state entity or county that is a party to 278 the contract must update the information described in paragraph 279 (a) or paragraph (b), respectively, in the contract tracking 280 system. An amendment to a contract includes, but is not limited 281 to, a renewal, termination, or extension of the contract or a 282 modification of the terms of the contract. 283 (d)(c)âFor each contract for which a state entity makes a 284 payment pursuant to a contract executed, amended, or extended on 285 or after July 1, 2023, the state entity shall post any documents 286 submitted pursuant to s. 216.1366 which indicate the use of 287 state funds as remuneration under the contract or a specified 288 payment associated with the contract on the contract tracking 289 system. 290 (e)(d)1.âRecords made available on the contract tracking 291 system may not reveal information made confidential or exempt by 292 law. 293 2.âEach state entity or county that is a party to a 294 contract must redact confidential or exempt information from the 295 contract and procurement documents before posting an electronic 296 copy on the contract tracking system. If a state entity or 297 county that is a party to the contract becomes aware that an 298 electronic copy of a contract or a procurement document has been 299 posted but has not been properly redacted, the state entity or 300 county must immediately notify the Chief Financial Officer and 301 must immediately remove the contract or procurement document 302 from the contract tracking system. Within 7 business days, the 303 state entity must post a properly redacted copy of the contract 304 or procurement document on the contract tracking system. 305 3.a.âIf a party to a contract, or an authorized 306 representative of a party to a contract, discovers that an 307 electronic copy of a contract or procurement document has been 308 posted to the contract tracking system but has not been properly 309 redacted, the party or representative may request the state 310 entity or county that is a party to the contract to redact the 311 confidential or exempt information. Upon receipt of the request, 312 the state entity or county shall redact the confidential or 313 exempt information. 314 b.âA request to redact confidential or exempt information 315 must be made in writing and delivered by mail, facsimile, 316 electronic transmission, or in person to the state entity or 317 county that is a party to the contract. The request must 318 identify the specific document, the page numbers that include 319 the confidential or exempt information, the information that is 320 confidential or exempt, and the applicable statutory exemption. 321 A fee may not be charged for a redaction made pursuant to the 322 request. 323 c.âA party to a contract may petition the circuit court for 324 an order directing compliance with this paragraph. 325 4.âThe contract tracking system shall display a notice of 326 the right of an affected party to request redaction of 327 confidential or exempt information contained on the system. 328 5.a.âThe Chief Financial Officer, the Department of 329 Financial Services, or an officer, employee, or contractor 330 thereof, is not responsible for redacting confidential or exempt 331 information from an electronic copy of a contract or procurement 332 document posted by another state entity or county on the system. 333 b.âThe Chief Financial Officer, the Department of Financial 334 Services, or an officer, employee, or contractor thereof, is not 335 liable for the failure of a state entity or county to redact the 336 confidential or exempt information. 337 (f)(e)1.âThe posting of information on the contract 338 tracking system or the provision of contract information on a 339 website for public viewing and downloading does not supersede 340 the duty of a state entity or county to respond to a public 341 records request or subpoena for the information. 342 2.âA request for a copy of a contract or procurement 343 document or certified copy of a contract or procurement document 344 shall be made to the state entity or county that is party to the 345 contract. The request may not be made to the Chief Financial 346 Officer, the Department of Financial Services, or an officer, 347 employee, or contractor thereof, unless the Chief Financial 348 Officer or the department is a party to the contract. 349 3.âA subpoena for a copy of a contract or procurement 350 document or certified copy of a contract or procurement document 351 must be served on the state entity or county that is a party to 352 the contract and that maintains the original documents. The 353 Chief Financial Officer, the Department of Financial Services, 354 or an officer, employee, or contractor thereof, may not be 355 served a subpoena for those records unless the Chief Financial 356 Officer or the department is a party to the contract. 357 (g)(f)âThe Chief Financial Officer may regulate and 358 prohibit the posting of records that could facilitate identity 359 theft or fraud, such as signatures; compromise or reveal an 360 agency investigation; reveal the identity of undercover 361 personnel; reveal proprietary business information or trade 362 secrets; reveal an individualâs medical information; or reveal 363 another record or information that the Chief Financial Officer 364 believes may jeopardize the health, safety, or welfare of the 365 public. However, such action by the Chief Financial Officer does 366 not supersede the duty of a state entity or county to provide a 367 copy of a public record upon request. 368 (h)(g)âThe Chief Financial Officer may adopt rules to 369 administer this subsection. 370 (i)(h)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 371 1.ââProcurement documentâ means any document or material 372 provided to the public or any vendor as part of a formal 373 competitive solicitation of goods or services undertaken by a 374 state entity or county, and a document or material submitted in 375 response to a formal competitive solicitation by any vendor who 376 is awarded the resulting contract. 377 2.ââState entityâ means an official, officer, commission, 378 board, authority, council, committee, or department of the 379 executive branch of state government; a state attorney, public 380 defender, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, capital 381 collateral regional counsel, and the Justice Administrative 382 Commission; the Public Service Commission; and any part of the 383 judicial branch of state government. 384 (j)(i)âIn lieu of posting in the contract tracking system 385 administered by the Chief Financial Officer, the Department of 386 Legal Affairs and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 387 Services may post the information described in paragraphs (a) 388 through (d) (c) to its own agency-managed website. The data 389 posted on the agency-managed website must be downloadable in a 390 format that allows offline analysis. 391 (k)(j)âThe requirement under paragraphs (a) through (d) (c) 392 that each agency or county post information and documentation 393 relating to contracts on the tracking system does not apply to 394 any record that could reveal attorney work product or strategy. 395 Section 5.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 396 215.985(14), Florida Statutes, may not be enforced until the 397 secure contract tracking system is able to accept reports. The 398 Chief Financial Officer shall make any changes necessary to the 399 secure contract tracking system to allow counties to make the 400 reports required by s. 215.985(14)(b), Florida Statutes, before 401 July 1, 2027. 402 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.